District of Columbia statutes.
46-508

Limitation of actions.

Any statute of limitations applicable to an action asserting a claim for relief under a premarital agreement is tolled during the marriage or domestic partnership of the parties to the agreement. However, equitable defenses limiting the time for enforcement, including laches and estoppel, are available to either party.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-82, § 9, 42 DCR 6770
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-79, § 8(g), 53 DCR 1035
1981 Ed., § 30-148.
D.C. Law 16-79 substituted “marriage or domestic partnership” for “marriage”.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 8 of the Uniform Premarital Agreement Act.